Utah statutes.
73-3a-107.   Publication of notice of application -- Corrections or amendments of applications.

(1) (a)  When an application is filed in accordance with Section 73-3a-106 and relevant provisions of Chapter 3, Appropriation, the state engineer shall publish a notice of the application:

(i)  once a week for a period of  two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the water source is located and where the water is to be used; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.

(b)  The notice shall:

(i)  state that an application has been made; and

(ii)  specify where the interested party may obtain additional information relating to the application.

(c)  The notice described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) may be published in more than one newspaper.

(2)  Clerical errors, ambiguities, and mistakes in the application that do not prejudice the rights of others may be corrected by order of the state engineer either before or after the publication of notice.

(3)  If amendments or corrections to the application are made that involve a change of point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use of water, the notice must be republished.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

